Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 13

Civil Service Notice

7-51-1301. Notice of examinations.

For civil service employment, notices shall be posted for any examinations given by any municipal government or any county government or any metropolitan government to establish promotion eligibility for civil service employment.

Such notice shall be posted at least thirty (30) days prior to the examination.

The chief executive officer of any local government may, upon written notice to an affected department head, waive the posting requirement of this section.

Acts 1989, ch. 203, § 1.